sl-SI: Stil okvirja tamburina: Živalska/nenavadna oblika; Srp; Polmesec; Oval; Pravokotnik; Okroglo; Zvezda; Drugo
de: Bauform des Tamburins: Tier-/Motivform; Sichelförmig; Halbmond; Oval; Rechteckig; Rund; Stern; Sonstige
cs: Styl rámu tamburíny: Zvířecí / netradiční tvar; Srpek; Půlměsíc; Oválný; Obdélníkový; Kulatý; Hvězda; Jiné
it: Stile del telaio del tamburello: Forma di animale/novità; A falce di luna; A mezzaluna; Ovale; Rettangolare; Rotondo; A stella; Altro
tr: Tef çerçeve tipi: Hayvan/Özel şekil; Hilal; Yarım ay; Oval; Dikdörtgen; Yuvarlak; Yıldız; Diğer
ko: 탬버린 프레임 형태: 동물/특수 모양; 초승달; 반달; 타원형; 직사각형; 원형; 별 모양; 기타
nb: Rammestil for tamburin: Dyre-/spesialform; Halvmåne; Halvmåne; Oval; Rektangulær; Rund; Stjerne; Annet
sv: Tamburin – typ av ram: Djur-/fantasiform; Skära; Halvmåne; Oval; Rektangulär; Rund; Stjärnformad; Annat
pt-PT: Estilo do aro da pandeireta: Formato de animal/novidade; Crescente; Meia lua; Oval; Retangular; Redondo; Estrela; Outro
bg-BG: Стил на рамката на тамбурина: Животинска/нестандартна форма; Полумесец; Половин луна; Овална; Правоъгълна; Кръгла; Звезда; Друго
zh-CN: 铃鼓框架样式: 动物/新奇形状; 新月形; 半月形; 椭圆形; 长方形; 圆形; 星形; 其他
th: Frame แทมบูรีน: รูปสัตว์/รูปทรงแปลกใหม่; รูปเสี้ยวพระจันทร์; รูปครึ่งวงกลม; รูปวงรี; รูปสี่เหลี่ยมผืนผ้า; ทรงกลม; รูปดาว; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 鈴鼓邊框樣式: 動物/新奇造型; 新月形; 半月形; 橢圓形; 長方形; 圓形; 星形; 其他
fr: Type de cadre du tambourin: Forme animale/fantaisie; Croissant; Demi-lune; Ovale; Rectangulaire; Ronde; Étoile; Autre
ru: Стиль рамки тамбурина: В форме животного/необычной формы; Полумесяц; Полукруглый; Овальный; Прямоугольный; Круглый; В форме звезды; Другое
en: Tambourine frame style: Animal/Novelty shape; Crescent; Half-moon; Oval; Rectangular; Round; Star; Other
lt-LT: Tambūrino rėmo tipas: Gyvūno / neįprastos formos; Išgaubtas; Pusmėnulio formos; Ovalo formos; Stačiakampis; Apvalus; Žvaigždės formos; Kita
hr-HR: Stil okvira za tamburin: Oblik životinje / neobičan oblik; Srpasti oblik; Polumjesec; Ovalni; Pravokutni; Okrugli; Zvijezda; Ostalo
ja: タンバリンフレームスタイル: 動物/ノベルティ型; 三日月型; 半月型; 楕円形; 長方形; 丸型; 星型; その他
el: Στυλ Frame ντέφι: Σχήμα ζώου/πρωτότυπο σχήμα; Μισοφέγγαρο; Ημισέληνος; Οβάλ; Ορθογώνιο; Στρογγυλό; Αστέρι; Άλλο
hu: Csörgődob keretének típusa: Állat- / figurális forma; Sarló alakú; Félhold; Ovális; Téglalap alakú; Kerek; Csillag; Egyéb
vi: Kiểu khung trống lắc: Hình động vật/mới lạ; Hình trăng lưỡi liềm; Hình bán nguyệt; Hình bầu dục; Hình chữ nhật; Hình tròn; Hình ngôi sao; Khác
nl: Tamboerijn frame stijl: Dieren-/fantasievorm; Halvemaanvormig; Halve maan; Ovaal; Rechthoekig; Rond; Ster; Overig
es: Estilo de marco de la pandereta: Forma de animal/novedad; Creciente; Media luna; Ovalado; Rectangular; Redondo; Estrella; Otro
pl: Rodzaj obręczy tamburynu: Kształt zwierzęcia / nietypowy; Półksiężyc; Półkole; Owalny; Prostokątny; Okrągły; Gwiazda; Inny
sk-SK: Štýl rámu tamburíny: Tvar zvieraťa/netradičný tvar; Polmesiac; Polmesiac; Oválny; Obdĺžnikový; Okrúhly; Hviezda; Iné
da: Rammestil for tamburin: Dyr/specialform; Halvmåne; Halvcirkel; Oval; Rektangulær; Rund; Stjerne; Andet
ro-RO: Stilul cadrului tamburinei: Formă de animal/inedită; Semilună; Jumătate de lună; Oval; Dreptunghiular; Rotund; Stea; Altele
pt-BR: Pandeiro estilo da armação: Formato de animal/diferenciado; Crescente; Meia-lua; Oval; Retangular; Redondo; Estrela; Outro
fi: Tamburiinin kehyksen tyyli: Eläin-/erikoiskuvio; Sirppimäinen; Puolikuu; Soikea; Suorakulmainen; Pyöreä; Tähti; Muu